Maryland, session 2026, HB0567.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Transportation
13–410.
(a) (1) [Except as otherwise provided in this title, when] WHEN it registers a
vehicle, the Administration shall issue [to the owner:
(i) One] ONE registration plate[, if the vehicle is:
1. A Class D (motorcycle) vehicle;
2. A Class F (tractor) vehicle;
3. A Class G (trailer) vehicle;
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0567*

HOUSE BILL 567
4. A Class L (historic) vehicle that was manufactured at least
50 years before the current model year; or
5. A Class N (street rod) vehicle that was manufactured at
least 50 years before the current model year; and
(ii) Two registration plates for every other vehicle] TO THE OWNER
OF THE VEHICLE.
(2) [However, as to temporary registration, the] THE Administration may
provide for the issuance of [only] one temporary registration plate for any vehicle.
(b) (1) [Each] THE registration plate shall display:
(i) The registration number assigned to the vehicle for which it is
issued; and
(ii) The name of this State, which may be abbreviated.
(2) The registration number may consist of letters, numerals, or both.
(c) (1) This subsection applies only to the following vehicles:
(i) A Class A (passenger) vehicle;
(ii) A Class E (truck) vehicle registered or capable of registration
under § 13–917 of this title; and
(iii) A Class M (multipurpose) vehicle.
(2) At the option of the registered owner of a vehicle for which A
registration [plates are] PLATE IS issued under this title, in addition to the information
otherwise required to be shown on the registration [plates] PLATE, the registration [plates]
PLATE may display a sticker indicating the name of the county, including Baltimore City,
in which the owner of the vehicle resides.
(3) The Administration shall:
(i) Approve a sticker design option that complies with paragraph (2)
of this subsection; and
(ii) Offer to each vehicle owner applying for A new or replacement
registration [plates] PLATE under this title the option to select a sticker that displays the
owner’s county of residence.

HOUSE BILL 567 3
(4) In addition to the annual registration fee otherwise required under this
title, the Administration may charge a fee, not to exceed its costs, for issuing or replacing
the county sticker offered under this subsection.
(5) A vehicle owner may not display stickers that show a county name other
than the owner’s county of residence.
(6) A county sticker issued under this subsection may not be placed on a
special registration plate or a commemorative registration plate issued under Subtitle 6 of
this title.
(d) Registration plates may be reflectorized and shall be manufactured of a
material warranted to have a durability of at least 5 years. However, prior to registration
plates being reflectorized, the Administration shall obtain approval of the General
Assembly through a budget item.
(e) (1) During subsequent registration years, the Administrator may order the
continued use of registration plates that are valid during any current registration year,
and, after so doing, the Administrator shall issue, at the time a vehicle’s registration is
renewed, a validation tab to evidence payment of the vehicle’s annual registration fee.
(2) The tab shall be displayed on the [plates] PLATE of the vehicle in the
manner that the Administrator requires.
(3) The Administrator from time to time shall evaluate the condition of
registration plates issued under this title and may provide for the manufacture and
issuance of new registration plates. These new registration plates shall be issued and
subsequently validated in the manner required by this subtitle.
(f) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (d) of this section, the
Administration may issue reflectorized registration plates under §§ 13–618 and 13–619 of
this title.
(g) The dimensions of a registration plate issued for a Class D (motorcycle) vehicle
shall be 7 inches wide by 4 inches high.
(h) A registration plate that is required to be returned to the Administration may
be returned through the mail.
13–411.
(a) [On a vehicle for which two registration plates are required, one plate shall be
attached on the front and the other on the rear of the vehicle.
(b) On a vehicle for which one registration plate is required, the] THE
REGISTRATION plate shall be attached on the:

HOUSE BILL 567
(1) Front of the vehicle for a Class F (tractor) vehicle; and
(2) Rear of the vehicle for every other vehicle.
[(c)] (B) (1) At all times, [each] THE registration plate shall be:
(i) Maintained free from foreign materials, including A registration
plate [covers] COVER as defined in § 13–411.1 of this subtitle, and in a condition to be
clearly legible; and
(ii) Securely fastened to the vehicle for which it is issued:
1. In a horizontal position;
2. In a manner that prevents the plate from swinging; and
3. In a place and position to be clearly visible.
(2) For a violation involving the placement of an object framing or
bordering the edges of a registration plate, a police officer may enforce this subsection only
as a secondary action when the police officer detains a driver of a motor vehicle for a
suspected violation of another provision of the Code.
[(d)] (C) Except as otherwise expressly permitted by the Maryland Vehicle Law,
as to any vehicle required to be registered under this title, a person may not drive the
vehicle on any highway in this State, unless there is attached to the vehicle and displayed
on it, as required in this title:
(1) A registration plate [or plates] issued for the vehicle by the
Administration for the current registration period; and
(2) Any validation tab issued for the vehicle under this subtitle.
[(e)] (D) Except as otherwise expressly permitted by the Maryland Vehicle Law,
as to any vehicle required to be registered under this title, the owner of the vehicle may not
permit the vehicle to be driven on any highway in this State, unless there is attached to
and displayed on the vehicle, as required in this title:
(1) A registration plate [or plates] issued by the Administration for the
current registration period; and
(2) Any validation tab issued for the vehicle under this subtitle.
[(f)] (E) Except as otherwise expressly permitted by the Maryland Vehicle Law,
a vehicle used or driven in this State may not display on either its front or rear any expired
registration plate issued by any state.

HOUSE BILL 567 5
[(g)] (F) Except as otherwise expressly permitted by the Maryland Vehicle Law,
a person may not display or permit to be displayed on any vehicle used or driven in this
State any registration plate issued for another vehicle or to a person other than the owner
of the vehicle.
[(h)] (G) (1) A vehicle registered as a historic or antique vehicle (Class L) in
this State or in another state, when used or driven in this State, may display vintage
registration plates as an indication of the historic or antique nature of the vehicle. Except
as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, the place on the vehicle provided for the
display of A registration [plates] PLATE may only be used for the display of THE current
registration [plates] PLATE in accordance with subsections (a) [through (c)] AND (B) of
this section, and any vintage registration plates which are used shall be displayed
elsewhere on the vehicle.
(2) If the Administration authorizes the display of vintage registration
plates in lieu of THE current registration [plates] PLATE, as provided in § 13–936.1 of this
title, the vintage registration plates shall be displayed as required under subsections (a)
[through (c)] AND (B) of this section. However, the current registration [plates] PLATE
shall be kept in the vehicle at all times.
[(i)] (H) It is the duty of every police officer to report to the Administration all
vehicles operated in violation of this section. The Administration shall verify whether the
owner of a reported vehicle has complied with this section.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That any reference in the
Annotated Code of Maryland to multiple registration plates rendered obsolete by this Act
shall be corrected by the publisher of the Annotated Code of Maryland, in consultation with
and subject to the approval of the Department of Legislative Services, with no further
action required by the General Assembly. The publisher shall adequately describe any
correction made under this section in an editor’s note following the section affected.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That any reduction in the
expenditures of the Motor Vehicle Administration resulting from the issuance of a single
registration plate instead of two registration plates shall be retained in the Transportation
Trust Fund.
SECTION 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.